Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2613
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

The Uniform Environmental Covenants Act modifies, limits, or supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede section 101 of that act, 15 U.S.C. 7001(a), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103 of that act, 15 U.S.C. 7003(b).

Laws 2005, LB 298, § 14.